District of Columbia statutes.
46-402

Marriages void ab initio — Judicial decree.

Any of such marriages may also be declared to have been null and void by judicial decree.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1391, ch. 854, § 1284

Cross References

Proceedings to annul marriage, see §§ 16-903, 16-904.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-102.
1973 Ed., § 30-102.